Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB5133.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 1. This act may be cited as the "central bank digital currency prevention act". Sec. 2. As used in this act: (a) "Central bank digital currency" means a digital currency, a digital medium of exchange, or a digital monetary unit of account issued by the United States Federal Reserve System, a federal agency, a state agency, a foreign government, a foreign central bank, or a foreign reserve system, that is made directly available to a consumer and processed and validated by those entities. (b) "Legal tender" means money that is recognized by law as a valid means of payment and settlement of debt. Sec. 3. (1) A governmental entity shall not do any of the following: (a) Accept central bank digital currency as legal tender in this state. (b) Require central bank digital currency as legal tender for a service, tax, license, permit, fee, information, or other amount due to the governmental entity. (2) A governmental entity shall not advocate for or support the testing, adoption, or implementation of a central bank digital currency by the United States government. Sec. 4. (1) A person that suffers a loss as a result of a violation of this act may bring a civil action against the governmental entity that committed the violation to recover damages. (2) In an action under this section, the court shall award a prevailing plaintiff 3 times the amount of the plaintiff's actual damages.